Colorado statutes. TITLE 23 Postsecondary Education
ARTICLE 1 COLORADO COMMISSION ON HIGHER EDUCATION
23-1-121.8. Department directive - workgroup on diversity in the educator workforce - duties - recommendations - report - legislative declaration - definitions - repeal.

The general assembly finds and declares that:

A high-quality teacher is the most important in-school factor for student achievement;

Further, students benefit from seeing a diverse group of educators in school classrooms;

In Colorado in 2019, seventy-six percent of all teachers were women and sixty-seven percent of all teachers in Colorado identified as White women;

However, the student demographics in Colorado are significantly more diverse and will continue to become more diverse. For example, in 2019, nearly forty-seven percent of all public school students identified as non-White and fourteen percent of students considered themselves to be English language learners.

The general assembly further finds and declares that there are many barriers to preparing, recruiting, and retaining a high-quality, diverse educator workforce.

One barrier is how teachers are licensed. A study by the national council on teacher quality reported that only forty-six percent of elementary school teaching candidates pass their licensing test on the first try. Moreover, only thirty-eight percent of Black teaching candidates, fifty-four percent of Hispanic teaching candidates, and seventy-five percent of White teaching candidates pass the licensing test, even after multiple attempts and even though they completed and graduated from an accredited teacher preparation program.

Therefore, the general assembly declares that an important step to increasing diversity among Colorado's educators is to task the Colorado department of higher education and the Colorado department of education to investigate barriers to and effective strategies for preparing, recruiting, and retaining a diverse educator workforce that better reflects the diversity of Colorado's students.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Department of education" means the department of education created in section 24-1-115.

"Diverse educator workforce" means teachers and special services providers who have a disability or who are of a gender, ethnicity, or race that is underrepresented in the educator workforce relative to the disability, gender, ethnicity, or race of Colorado students served by the educator workforce.

The department of higher education, in conjunction with the department of education, shall convene a workgroup to investigate barriers to the preparation, recruitment, and retention of a diverse educator workforce and to recommend effective strategies for preparing, recruiting, and retaining a diverse educator workforce.

The department of higher education and the department of education shall select workgroup members and may seek recommendations or nominations from interested stakeholders. The workgroup members must be representative of the racial and ethnic diversity of the Colorado student population, as determined by the department of education, by ensuring that at least fifty percent of the workgroup is comprised of persons from historically underrepresented minority groups. The workgroup may consist of members from other workgroups within the department of higher education or department of education. At a minimum, the selected workgroup members must include but are not limited to one or more of the following persons or organizations, or their representatives:

A representative of the department of higher education;

A representative of the department of education;

Deans of teacher preparation programs at state institutions of higher education;

Directors of alternative teacher programs;

Representatives from community colleges governed by the state board for community colleges and occupational education;

Teachers serving in traditional district schools who hold an initial or professional teacher's license pursuant to article 60.5 of title 22;

Teachers serving in district charter schools;

Principals or school leaders of traditional district schools or district charter schools, including schools that have a diverse educator workforce;

Graduates of teacher preparation programs, who may include graduates who did not pass the licensing test on the first try;

Researchers with expertise in the preparation, recruitment, or retention of a diverse educator workforce; and

Nonprofit or other organizations that have expertise in the preparation, recruitment, or retention of a diverse educator workforce.

The workgroup shall investigate barriers to the preparation, retention, and recruitment of a diverse educator workforce and shall consider strategies to increase diversity in the educator workforce. The issues considered by the workgroup may include but are not limited to:

The data and recommendations from the December 16, 2014, report prepared for the department of education by Augenblick, Palaich and Associates titled "Keeping Up with the Kids: Increasing Minority Teacher Representation in Colorado";

Effective strategies to build a strong local pipeline for students, especially diverse students, who are or may consider becoming educators, including paid mentorships and teaching and volunteer opportunities;

Educator preparation programs and how they may inhibit or promote success for diverse educator candidates;

Effective strategies to assist paraprofessionals, substitute teachers, and noncertified educators who are engaged in the profession but who are not licensed due to financial difficulties, difficulty in passing the state-certified content test, distance to testing location, preparation and testing fees, or for other reasons;

Whether creating partnerships between school districts that serve minority students and minority-serving institutions will increase the diversity of the educator workforce; and

Effective strategies to retain the existing diverse educator workforce in Colorado, including diverse educators in hard-to-staff schools, which strategies may include financial incentives, such as stipends or bonuses, and robust professional development opportunities.

On or before September 30, 2022, the department of higher education and the department of education shall submit a written report from the workgroup to the education committees of the house of representatives and the senate, or any successor committees, concerning:

The workgroup's findings, including identification of existing barriers to the preparation, recruitment, and retention of a diverse educator workforce;

The relevance of the findings and recommendations set forth in the December 16, 2014, report referenced in subsection (5)(a) of this section;

Effective strategies for preparing, recruiting, and retaining a diverse educator workforce in Colorado; and

The workgroup's recommendations, including any necessary changes to statutes or agency rules.

The workgroup may submit interim findings and recommendations for consideration during the 2022 regular legislative session prior to the completion of the final written report pursuant to subsection (6)(a) of this section.

This section is repealed, effective July 1, 2024.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire section added, (HB 21-1010), ch. 375, p. 2477, § 1, effective September 7.

23-1-122. Commission directive - separately funded policy areas. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 94:

Entire section added, p. 43, § 2, effective March 11.

L. 95:

(1) amended and (7) to (11) added, p. 49, § 2, effective March 20.

L. 97:

Entire section repealed, p. 1644, § 1, effective June 5.

23-1-122.1. Commission directive - separately funded policy areas - fiscal years 1996-97 and 1997-98. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 96:

Entire section added, p. 89, § 2, effective March 20.

L. 97:

Entire section repealed, p. 1644, § 1, effective June 5.

23-1-123. Commission directive - fee policies - definitions. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 94:

Entire section added, p. 1992, § 1, effective June 2.

L. 97:

(1), (2)(a), (3), (5), (6)(a), and (7) amended, p. 1398, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 99:

(5)(a)(II), IP(5)(a)(III), (5)(b)(I), (5)(b)(II), and IP(5)(b)(III) amended, p. 902, § 1, effective August 4; (5)(c)(III) amended, p. 624, § 22, effective August 4.

L. 2000:

(5)(i) added, p. 310, § 1, effective April 7.

L. 2009:

(5)(i), IP(7)(b), and (7)(b)(I) amended, (HB 09-1313), ch. 243, p. 1097, § 1, effective May 11.

L. 2011:

Entire section repealed, (HB 11-1301), ch. 297, p. 1418, § 5, effective August 10.

23-1-124. Commission directive - sophomore assessments. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire section added, p. 372, § 26, effective April 10.

L. 2008:

Entire section repealed, p. 1483, § 30, effective May 28.

23-1-125. Commission directive - student bill of rights - degree requirements - implementation of core courses - competency test - prior learning - prior work-related experience.

Student bill of rights. The general assembly hereby finds that students enrolled in public institutions of higher education shall have the following rights:

Students should be able to complete their associate of arts and associate of science degree programs in no more than sixty credit hours or their baccalaureate programs in no more than one hundred twenty credit hours unless there are additional degree requirements recognized by the commission;

A student can sign a two-year or four-year graduation agreement that formalizes a plan for that student to obtain a degree in two or four years, unless there are additional degree requirements recognized by the commission;

Students have a right to clear and concise information concerning which courses must be completed successfully to complete their degrees;

Students have a right to know which courses are transferable among the state public two-year and four-year institutions of higher education;

Students, upon completion of core general education courses, regardless of the delivery method, should have those courses satisfy the core course requirements of all Colorado public institutions of higher education;

Students have a right to know if courses from one or more public higher education institutions satisfy the students' degree requirements;

A student's credit for the completion of the core requirements and core courses shall not expire for ten years from the date of initial enrollment and shall be transferrable.

Degree requirements. The commission shall establish a standard of a one-hundred-twenty-hour baccalaureate degree, not including specific professional degree programs that have additional degree requirements recognized by the commission.

Core courses. The department, in consultation with each Colorado public institution of higher education, is directed to outline a plan to implement a core course concept that defines the general education course guidelines for all public institutions of higher education. The core of courses shall be designed to ensure that students demonstrate competency in reading, critical thinking, written communication, mathematics, and technology. The core of courses shall consist of at least thirty credit hours but shall not exceed forty credit hours. Individual institutions of higher education shall conform their own core course requirements with the guidelines developed by the department and shall identify the specific courses that meet the general education course guidelines. Any such guidelines developed by the department shall be submitted to the commission for its approval. In creating and adopting the guidelines, the department and the commission, in collaboration with the public institutions of higher education, may make allowances for baccalaureate programs that have additional degree requirements recognized by the commission. If a statewide matrix of core courses is adopted by the commission, the courses identified by the individual institutions as meeting the general education course guidelines shall be included in the matrix. The commission shall adopt such policies to ensure that institutions develop the most effective way to implement the transferability of core course credits.

Competency testing. On or before July 1, 2010, the commission shall, in consultation with each public institution of higher education, define a process for students to test out of core courses, including specifying use of a national test or the criteria for approving institutionally devised tests. Beginning in the 2010-11 academic year, each public institution of higher education shall grant full course credits to students for the core courses they successfully test out of, free of tuition for those courses.

(4.5)

Prior learning.

Beginning in the 2013-14 academic year, each public institution of higher education shall adopt and make public a policy or program to determine academic credit for prior learning.

(4.7)

Prior work-related experience.

Pursuant to section 23-5-145.5, the council created and existing pursuant to section 23-1-108.5, in collaboration with the commission, shall create, adopt, and implement a plan to determine and award postsecondary academic credit for work-related experience.

Nonpublic institutions of higher education.

A nonpublic institution of higher education may choose to conform its core course requirements with, or adopt core course requirements that meet, the general education course guidelines developed by the department pursuant to subsection (3) of this section and identify the specific courses that meet the general education course guidelines. The nonpublic institution of higher education may require all of the students enrolled in the institution to take the core course requirements that are conformed or adopted as provided in this paragraph (a) or may require only those students who are concurrently enrolled, pursuant to article 35 of title 22, C.R.S., in a high school and in the nonpublic institution of higher education to take said core course requirements.

The core course requirements that a nonpublic institution of higher education conforms or adopts pursuant to this paragraph (a) shall comply with the number of credit hours required by the department and shall include courses in each of the subject areas identified by the department. The nonpublic institution of higher education shall submit to the department a description of its core course requirements with the initial review fee established pursuant to paragraph (c) of this subsection (5), and the department shall determine whether the nonpublic institution's core course requirements comply with the department's general education course guidelines. If the department determines that the nonpublic institution of higher education's core course requirements comply with the guidelines, then the nonpublic institution's core course credits shall be transferable to public institutions of higher education, and the nonpublic institution of higher education shall accept transfers of core course credits from the public institutions of higher education.

A nonpublic institution of higher education that chooses to seek transferability of its core course credits pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (5) shall, prior to the beginning of each academic year in which it seeks transferability, allow the department to review its general education core course requirements and its general education courses to ensure that they continue to meet the general education core course guidelines. The department may assess a fee as provided in paragraph (c) of this subsection (5) to offset the costs of the annual review.

The commission, in consultation with the department, shall establish the amounts of the initial review fee and the annual review fee of a nonpublic institution of higher education's general education core course requirements and core courses, which amounts shall not exceed the direct and indirect costs incurred by the department in initially reviewing and in annually reviewing the nonpublic institution's general education core course requirements and core courses. The department is authorized to collect the fees from nonpublic institutions of higher education as provided in paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection (5).

On or before March 1, 2016, the commission shall submit to the education committees of the senate and the house of representatives, or any successor committees, a report concerning the implementation of this subsection (5). At a minimum, the report shall include:

The names of the nonpublic institutions of higher education that are participating in the general education core course requirements;

The number of students who have transferred core course credits to or from a nonpublic institution of higher education;

Any issues that have arisen in the course of implementing this subsection (5); and

Any recommendations for changes to this subsection (5).

As used in this subsection (5), "nonpublic institution of higher education" means an educational institution operating in this state that:

Does not receive state general fund moneys in support of its operating costs;

Admits as regular students only persons having a high school diploma or the recognized equivalent of a high school diploma;

Is accredited by an accrediting agency or association approved by the United States department of education;

Provides an educational program for which it awards a bachelor's degree or a graduate degree;

Is authorized by the department of higher education to do business in Colorado pursuant to section 23-2-103.3;

Maintains a physical campus or instructional facility in Colorado; and

Has been determined by the United States department of education to be eligible to administer federal financial aid programs pursuant to Title IV of the federal "Higher Education Act of 1965", as amended.

Source:

L. 2001:

Entire section added, p. 1473, § 1, effective June 6.

L. 2008:

(3) amended, p. 1478, § 17, effective May 28.

L. 2010:

(4) amended and (5) added, (SB 10-108), ch. 301, p. 1427, § 1, effective May 27.

L. 2012:

(3) amended, (HB 12-1155), ch. 255, p. 1281, § 8, effective August 8; (4.5) added and (5)(e)(III) amended, (HB 12-1072), ch. 62, p. 223, § 2, effective August 8.

L. 2020:

(4.7) added, (HB 20-1002), ch. 255, p. 1244, § 3, effective July 8.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in the 2012 act adding subsection (4.5) and amending subsection (5)(e)(III), see section 1 of chapter 62, Session Laws of Colorado 2012. For the legislative declaration in HB 20-1002, see section 1 of chapter 255, Session Laws of Colorado 2020.

23-1-126. Commission directive - nursing programs.

The general assembly finds that Colorado is facing a shortage of nurses. It is determined by the general assembly that because nurses are crucial and integral to the health and welfare of the people of Colorado, it is therefore in the public interest to enhance educational opportunities for individuals pursuing a career in nursing.

The commission shall evaluate and implement two-year educational programs for professional registered nursing. The commission shall adopt any necessary policies and rules for the implementation of a two-year program for professional registered nursing.

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire section added, p. 1306, § 25, effective June 7.

23-1-127. Commission directive - regional education providers - criteria.

The general assembly finds, determines, and declares that:

The Colorado commission on higher education can better serve the citizens of this state by providing oversight and direction for the provision of regional education at Adams state university, Colorado Mesa university, and Western Colorado university; and

As regional education providers, Adams state university, Colorado Mesa university, and Western Colorado university shall have as their primary goal the assessment of regional educational needs and, in consultation with the Colorado commission on higher education, the allocation of resources for the purposes of meeting those needs.

A regional education provider's initiatives to meet its regional needs may include, but need not be limited to, the following:

Extension of existing programs;

Creation of new undergraduate programs;

Development of partnerships with two-year institutions; and

Facilitation of the delivery of graduate education through existing graduate institutions.

The Colorado commission on higher education shall, in consultation with Adams state university, Colorado Mesa university, and Western Colorado university, establish the criteria for designation as a regional education provider.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire section added, p. 788, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2011:

(1)(a), (1)(b), and (3) amended, (SB 11-265), ch. 292, p. 1366, § 17, effective August 10.

L. 2012:

(1) and (3) amended, (HB 12-1080), ch. 189, p. 758, § 12, effective May 19; (1) and (3) amended, (HB 12-1331), ch. 254, p. 1269, § 10, effective August 1.

L. 2019:

(1) and (3) amended, (HB 19-1178), ch. 400, p. 3545, § 10, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

Amendments to subsections (1) and (3) by House Bill 12-1080 and House Bill 12-1331 were harmonized.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in the 2011 act amending subsections (1)(a), (1)(b), and (3), see section 1 of chapter 292, Session Laws of Colorado 2011.

23-1-128. Commission directive - American sign language in higher education institutions.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"American sign language" means the natural language recognized globally that is used by members of the deaf community and that is linguistically complete with unique rules for language structure and use, that include phonology, morphology, syntax, semantics, and discourse.

"Higher education institution" means a state-supported institution of higher education.

On and after August 4, 2004, a higher education institution in the state may offer one or more elective courses in American sign language.

On or before December 1, 2004, the commission shall adopt the necessary policies and procedures to require higher education institutions in the state to treat American sign language as a foreign language for purposes of granting and receiving academic credit.

The commission shall specify in the policies and procedures described in paragraph (a) of this subsection (3) that:

A student who is enrolled in a higher education institution that offers American sign language courses may receive academic credit for the courses either by completing the courses or by demonstrating proficiency in American sign language, if the higher education institution gives credit for completing courses or demonstrating proficiency in any other foreign language;

Academic credit received for either completing an American sign language course or demonstrating proficiency in American sign language may be counted toward satisfaction of any foreign language requirements of the higher education institution offering the courses, except those requirements related to the content of the academic major; and

Academic credit received for either successful completion of American sign language courses in a secondary school or higher education institution or demonstrated proficiency in American sign language may be counted toward satisfaction of the foreign language entrance requirements of a higher education institution in the state.

Source:

L. 2004:

Entire section added, p. 254, § 1, effective August 4.

23-1-129. Commission directive - student loans.

On or before July 1, 2010, the commission shall adopt the necessary policies and procedures to require state-supported institutions of higher education to participate in student loan programs supported by the federal government.

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire section added, (HB 10-1428), ch. 390, p. 1831, § 9, effective June 9.

23-1-130. Department duty to report on workforce needs and credential production - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2012:

Entire section added, (HB 12-1061), ch. 74, p. 251, § 1, effective August 8.

L. 2016:

(2)(a) amended, (HB 16-1082), ch. 58, p. 143, § 11, effective August 10.

23-1-131. Commission directive - associate degree completion program - legislative declaration - definitions.

The general assembly finds and declares that, due to the demands of a global economy, the state and the nation have an increasing need for individuals with a postsecondary credential or degree. Many students begin their postsecondary education in a two-year institution and transfer to a four-year institution prior to receiving an associate degree. Some students who subsequently accumulate the credit hours necessary for an associate degree while at the four-year institution, or who leave the four-year institution prior to completing a bachelor's degree, would benefit from the award of an associate degree. The award of an associate degree not only rewards the student's efforts in attaining postsecondary education but also recognizes the investment of financial resources in postsecondary education by both the student and the state.

Therefore, the general assembly declares that the state's two-year and four-year institutions should work in collaboration with the commission to develop a process that reduces a potential barrier to degree completion by providing students with information about the student's eligibility for an associate degree.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Associate degree" means an associate of arts or associate of science degree.

"Four-year institution" means a state-supported institution of higher education that is authorized to grant baccalaureate degrees.

"Two-year institution" means a state-supported institution of higher education, or a local district college, that is authorized to grant associate degrees.

The commission shall collaborate with the governing boards of the two-year and four-year institutions to develop and coordinate a process to notify students concerning eligibility for the award of an associate degree. The notification process shall apply to students at a four-year institution who have accumulated seventy credit hours at a four-year institution and who transferred to the institution after completing the residency requirements for an associate degree at a two-year institution. The notification process developed pursuant to this section shall specify the role of the student, the department, and the two-year and four-year institutions in the process, with the role of the four-year institutions limited to providing contact information for eligible students. The notification process shall be implemented no later than the beginning of the 2013-14 academic year.

The two-year and four-year institutions shall agree upon the contents of the notification to eligible students. At a minimum, the notification shall include the requirements for the degree audit by the two-year institution and information concerning the process for a student to be awarded an associate degree in the future if the degree requirements are not met or the student declines the associate degree at the time of the notification.

Nothing in this section limits the ability of the governing boards of two-year and four-year institutions to develop reverse transfer agreements that are consistent with the intent of this section.

Each two-year and four-year institution shall provide students with information concerning the process developed pursuant to this section.

Source:

L. 2012:

Entire section added, (SB 12-045), ch. 124, p. 419, § 1, effective April 18.

23-1-131.5. Commission directive - Colorado re-engaged (CORE) initiative - four-year institutions - associate degrees - report - definitions.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Colorado re-engaged initiative" or "CORE initiative" means the initiative created in this section to authorize institutions to award associate degrees to eligible students.

"Eligible student" means an undergraduate student who meets the criteria specified in subsection (5) of this section.

"Institution of higher education" or "institution" means a local district college operating pursuant to article 71 of this title 23 or a state institution of higher education as defined in section 23-18-102 (10)(a), but not including an institution governed by the state board for community colleges and occupational education.

There is created in the department the Colorado re-engaged, or CORE, initiative to authorize institutions of higher education to award associate degrees, notwithstanding an institution's role and mission, to eligible students who enroll in baccalaureate degree programs and earn at least seventy credit hours in the programs, but withdraw from the institutions before attaining the baccalaureate degree. The goal of awarding an associate degree through the CORE initiative is to increase a student's earning potential by granting the student a degree, making it more likely the student will re-enroll and complete a baccalaureate degree or higher.

The commission shall collaborate with the institutions of higher education to develop and coordinate a process to identify eligible students and award associate degrees through the CORE initiative. To implement the CORE initiative, the role of the department is to:

Publicize the CORE initiative, including the eligibility requirements that a student must meet to obtain an associate degree through the CORE initiative as described in subsection (5) of this section; and

Work with the institutions to identify eligible students and notify those eligible students of their eligibility to obtain an associate degree through the CORE initiative and the process for doing so.

The role of an institution that chooses to participate in the CORE initiative is limited to:

Providing to the department contact information for eligible students, if available;

Determining whether an eligible student qualifies for an associate degree based on earned credits and courses taken;

Issuing an associate degree upon the request of an eligible student and advising the student of opportunities to re-enroll at the institution to complete the baccalaureate degree program; and

Submitting to the department the information described in subsection (6) of this section.

An institution that chooses to participate in the CORE initiative must obtain approval from the institution's accrediting agency to grant associate degrees through the CORE initiative. An institution may award an associate degree to an eligible student through the CORE initiative for up to ten academic years after the last semester in which the eligible student enrolled at the institution.

An institution that chooses to participate in the CORE initiative shall not allow a student to enroll in the institution to obtain an associate degree and shall not offer programs that are designed to lead to associate degrees; except that this subsection (4)(c) does not apply to a local district college, Adams state university, Fort Lewis college with regard to the authority granted in section 23-52-101 (2)(a), and Colorado Mesa university. The associate degrees issued by institutions through the CORE initiative shall not be considered in determining an institution's funding pursuant to part 3 of article 18 of this title 23.

To receive an associate degree through the CORE initiative, a student must:

Not have transferred to the institution directly from an institution governed by the state board of community colleges and occupational education;

Not have been enrolled in the institution for at least two consecutive semesters; and

Have earned at least seventy credit hours, which credits must include completion of the institution's general education core course requirements and completion of all other courses required for an associate degree program approved by the commission.

Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary, a student who is eligible to receive an associate degree through a program authorized in section 23-1-131 is not eligible to receive an associate degree through the CORE initiative.

Each institution that chooses to participate in the CORE initiative shall, by August 1, 2022, and by August 1 each year thereafter, report to the department the number of eligible students to whom the institution awarded an associate degree through the CORE initiative, the types of associate degrees awarded through the CORE initiative, and the number of students who re-enrolled in the institution after receiving an associate degree through the CORE initiative. The department shall review and compile the annual reports and, by January 15, 2025, submit to the education committees of the senate and the house of representatives, or any successor committees, a report concerning implementation of the CORE initiative, including, to the extent discernable, the degree to which students who receive associate degrees through the CORE initiative re-enroll in an institution to complete a baccalaureate degree. The department may also include in the report recommendations for changes to the CORE initiative, including recommendations for incentives to encourage institutions to participate in the CORE initiative.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire section added, (HB 21-1330), ch. 377, p. 2502, § 6, effective June 29.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 21-1330, see section 1 of chapter 377, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.

23-1-132. Commission directive - tuition waivers for exonerated persons.

On or before September 1, 2013, the commission shall implement a policy whereby, except as limited in this section, each institution of higher education in the state shall waive all tuition costs, including any mandatory fees associated with attendance at the institution, for an exonerated person, as defined in section 13-65-101 (3), C.R.S., and for any child of an exonerated person or custodial child of an exonerated person, as defined in section 13-65-101 (2), C.R.S., if:

The exonerated person, or the child or custodial child of the exonerated person, satisfies the criteria described in subsection (2) of this section;

The exonerated person, or the child or custodial child of the exonerated person, satisfies the admission requirements of the institution; and

The exonerated person, or the child or custodial child of the exonerated person, remains in satisfactory academic standing in accordance with the academic policies of the institution.

To receive a tuition waiver from an institution of higher education as described in subsection (1) of this section, an exonerated person or child or custodial child of an exonerated person shall apply to the institution and request such waiver in writing not later than two years after the later of the following dates:

The date upon which a court issued to the state court administrator directions to compensate an exonerated person pursuant to section 13-65-103, C.R.S.; or

In the case of a child or custodial child of an exonerated person, the date upon which the child graduated from high school.

The policy described in subsection (1) of this section must be implemented by all state-supported institutions of higher education, including but not limited to all postsecondary institutions in the state supported in whole or in part by state funds, including community colleges, extension programs of the state-supported universities and colleges, local district colleges, and area technical colleges.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire section added, (HB 13-1230), ch. 409, p. 2425, § 4, effective June 5.

L. 2016:

(3) amended, (HB 16-1082), ch. 58, p. 143, § 12, effective August 10.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in the 2013 act adding this section, see section 1 of chapter 409, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

23-1-133. Commission directive - bachelor of science degree in nursing program - Aims community college - approval.

Repealed.

In determining whether to approve a bachelor of science degree in nursing program as a completion degree to students who have or are pursuing an associate degree in nursing or a practical nursing certificate for Aims community college pursuant to section 23-71-102 (1)(b)(II)(B), the commission shall consider the following criteria:

Whether Aims community college provides data demonstrating workforce and student demand for the degree program;

The regional and professional accreditation requirements for the degree program, if applicable, and whether the college can satisfy those requirements, as appropriate, at both the institutional and program levels;

Whether Aims community college can demonstrate that providing the degree program within its service area is cost-effective for the student and Aims community college;

Whether Aims community college can demonstrate that the degree program is sufficiently distinguishable from:

An existing degree program at a state four-year institution of higher education that is provided to a student who resides in Aims community college's geographic service area, as defined by the commission pursuant to section 23-1-109 (2), without the student having to change his or her residence; or

A degree program that has been successfully offered previously in conjunction with a state four-year institution of higher education, which degree program will be reinstated sooner than the degree program could be offered by the community college; and

Whether the degree program could be provided through a statewide transfer agreement pursuant to section 23-1-108 (7) with an accredited state four-year institution in Aims community college's geographic service area or with an accredited state four-year institution of higher education that has a statewide service area, as defined by the commission pursuant to section 23-1-109 (2), that will deliver an existing bachelor of science degree in nursing program in Aims community college's geographic service area sooner than the degree program could be offered by Aims community college.

In addition, in determining whether to approve a bachelor of science degree in nursing program, the commission:

Shall consider whether Aims community college has met the criteria set forth in subsections (2)(a)(I) to (2)(a)(IV) of this section and whether the proposed degree program is in the best interests of the state of Colorado;

Shall consult with Aims community college and state four-year institutions of higher education concerning whether the collaboration described in subparagraph (V) of paragraph (a) of this subsection (2) is feasible; and

May consult with any state four-year institution of higher education that shares the same geographic service area, as defined by the commission pursuant to section 23-1-109 (2), concerning the proposed degree program to inform the commission of any anticipated systemwide effects of the new degree program.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire section added, (SB 14-004), ch. 13, p. 119, § 4, effective August 6.

L. 2021:

(1) repealed and IP(2)(a), (2)(a)(V), IP(2)(b), and (2)(b)(I) amended (HB 21-1330), ch. 377, p. 2504, § 7, effective June 29.

L. 2022:

IP(2)(a) amended, (SB 22-003), ch. 71, p. 368, § 2, effective August 10.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 14-004, see section 1 of chapter 13, Session Laws of Colorado 2014. For the legislative declaration in HB 21-1330, see section 1 of chapter 377, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.